California statutes. Corporations Code
(5) A copy of a final judgment and a copy of the civil complaint and any amendments thereto upon which the judgment finding fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit, made with the intent to defraud, was made shall be deemed to satisfy compliance with the requirements prescribed in this paragraph. The claimant may also provide any additional documentation that he or she believes may help the Secretary of State in evaluating the application, including, but not limited to, evidence submitted to the court in the underlying judgment or a detailed narrative statement of facts in explanation of the allegations of the complaint upon which the underlying judgment is based.

(6) If the final judgment is a criminal restitution order, the claimant shall provide the charging document and the restitution order, and if the defendant is an agent, documentation showing the defendant named in the restitution order is an agent as defined in this chapter.

(7) A description of searches and inquiries conducted by or on behalf of the claimant with respect to the judgment debtor’s assets liable to be sold or applied to satisfaction of the judgment. A court’s determination or finding of the judgment debtor’s insolvency or lack of assets to pay the claimant shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements prescribed in this paragraph.

(8) Each of the following representations by the claimant:

(A) That the claimant is not a spouse, registered
 domestic partner, or an immediate family member of an employee, officer, director, managing agent, or other principal of the corporation nor a personal representative of the spouse, registered domestic partner, or an immediate family member of an employee, officer, director, managing agent, or other principal of the corporation.

(B) That the claimant has complied with all of the requirements of this section.

(C) That the judgment underlying the claim meets the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b), including all of the following:

(i) That the judgment was for fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit by the corporation or the agent of the corporation, with the intent to defraud.

(ii) That the judgment is unpaid in part or in whole.

(iii) That the underlying judgment and debt have not been discharged in bankruptcy, or the underlying judgment is statutorily nondischargeable, or, in the case of a bankruptcy proceeding that is open at or after the time of the filing of the application, that the judgment and debt have been declared to be nondischargeable by the judge or stipulated as nondischargeable by the parties in the proceeding and that the claimant has been granted permission by the bankruptcy court to proceed with collection or otherwise proceed with the claimant’s claims against the judgment debtor or debtors.

(D) That the claimant does not have a pending claim and has not collected on the final judgment from any other restitution fund. If the claimant has a pending claim or has collected from another fund, a description of the nature of the pending claim and the recovery amounts from any restitution
 fund.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) the Secretary of State shall not condition an award of payment from the fund upon a claimant providing any additional information or documents other than those prescribed in subdivision (c).

(2) If the final judgment in favor of the claimant was by default, stipulated, a consent judgment, or pursuant to Section 594 of the Code of Civil Procedure or if the action against the corporation or its agent was defended by a trustee in bankruptcy, the Secretary of State may request additional documents and information from the claimant to determine whether the claim is valid.

(3) If the final judgment does not expressly set forth the amount of damages that were awarded for actual loss and compensatory damages that are payable from the fund
 pursuant to Section 2289, the Secretary of State may ask the claimant to provide copies of documentation pertaining to the amount of the actual and direct loss and the awarded compensatory damages or both of those findings. For purposes of this section, “sufficient proof of money damages” may include any of the following: copies of bank account statements showing or confirming particular transactions, copies of the front and back of checks made payable to the corporation that have been negotiated, credit card statements showing or confirming particular transactions, or similar documentation demonstrating financial loss directly resulting from the fraudulent acts by the corporation or its agent and the amount of compensatory damages awarded by the court.

(4) If there is no court determination or finding of the insolvency of the judgment debtor or lack of assets to pay the claimant, the Secretary of State may request additional information and
 documentation from the claimant to determine what assets, if any, are available to satisfy the final judgment.

(e) The Secretary of State shall include with the application form a notice to the claimant of his or her obligation to protect the underlying judgment from discharge in bankruptcy, to be appended to the application.

(f) If a claimant is a spouse, registered domestic partner, or an immediate family member of an employee, officer, director, managing agent, or other principal of the corporation, or is a personal representative of the spouse, registered domestic partner, or an immediate family member of an employee, officer, director, managing agent, or other principal of the corporation, the claimant shall not be precluded for that reason alone from receiving an award where the claimant can otherwise meet the requirements of this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 25.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2282.1.

(a) The Secretary of State shall provide notice to the corporation and all agents named in the application that a claimant has submitted an application for payment from the fund and shall also provide within that notice, as prescribed by the Secretary of State, the method to contest the payment from the fund.

(b) The notice to the corporation shall be provided by certified mail addressed to the corporation’s last designated agent for service of process of record with the Secretary of State and notice shall be deemed complete five calendar days after the notice is mailed.

(c) If the corporation or its agent wishes to contest payment
 of an application by the Secretary of State, the corporation or agent shall mail or deliver a written response addressed to the Secretary of State within 30 calendar days of the notice of the application, and shall mail or deliver a copy of the response to the claimant. The written response of the corporation or agent shall not be directed to issues and facts conclusively established by the underlying judgment. If the corporation fails to mail or deliver a timely response, the corporation shall have waived the corporation’s right to present objections to payment of the application, and shall not thereafter be entitled to notice of any action taken or proposed to be taken by the Secretary of State with respect to the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 390, Sec. 3.   (AB 2759)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2282.2.

(a) The response by the corporation shall be by an officer or director and shall contain proof of service showing that a copy of the response was sent to the claimant, or if the claimant is represented by an attorney for purposes of the application, to the claimant’s attorney, at the address specified in the application for the claimant or the claimant’s attorney, respectively.

(b) If the corporation
 is not represented by an attorney in objecting to payment of the application, the response shall contain the name, title, and address of the officer, director, managing agent, or other responsible person authorized to represent the corporation and the address at which the corporation wishes to receive correspondence and notices relating to the application, and a telephone number at which the corporation’s representative can be reached during regular business hours. If the corporation is represented by an attorney in objecting to the application, the response shall contain the name, business address, and telephone number of the attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   (SB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2283.

(a) If the Secretary of State determines that the application, as submitted by the claimant, fails to comply with the requirements of Section 2282, the Secretary of State shall, within 21 calendar days after receipt of the application by a single claimant or within 40 calendar days after receipt of the application by multiple claimants, mail an itemized list of deficiencies to the claimant.

(b) The time
 within which the Secretary of State is required to act under Section 2284 shall be measured from the date of receipt by the Secretary of State of a completed application. In the event of an irreconcilable dispute between the claimant and the Secretary of State on the question of whether the application is complete, the claimant may immediately file the claim with the court pursuant to Section 2287.

(c) If the Secretary of State has mailed one or more itemized lists of deficiencies to a claimant, and, if after 30 calendar days the Secretary of State has not received a response to the latest list of deficiencies, the Secretary of State shall notify the claimant that, unless the claimant responds to the deficiencies within a specified period of time of not less than 15 calendar days, the application will be denied.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   (SB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2284.

(a) The Secretary of State shall render a final written decision on the application within 90 calendar days after a completed application has been received unless the claimant agrees in writing to extend the time within which the Secretary of State may render a decision.

(b) The Secretary of State may deny or grant the application or may enter into a compromise with the claimant to pay less in settlement
 than the full amount of the claim. If the claimant refuses to accept a settlement of the claim offered by the Secretary of State, the written decision of the Secretary of State shall be to deny the claim. Evidence of settlement offers and discussions between the Secretary of State and the claimant shall not be competent evidence in judicial proceedings undertaken by the claimant pursuant to Section 2287.

(c) Upon issuance of a proposed decision to award payment or an offer to compromise, the claimant shall have 60 calendar days from the date of service of the proposed award or offer to compromise to accept the proposed award or offer to compromise. If the claimant fails to accept the proposed award or offer to compromise within the specified time, the application shall be deemed denied.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   (SB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2285.

The Secretary of State shall give written notice, as prescribed by the Secretary of State, of a decision rendered with respect to the application to the claimant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   (SB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2286.

The Secretary of State shall give notice, as prescribed by the Secretary of State, to the corporation and all agents named in the application that the Secretary of State has made a decision to award funds to the claimant and shall provide a copy of the decision to the corporation and all agents named in the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 390, Sec. 4.   (AB 2759)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2287.

(a) A claimant against whom the Secretary of State has rendered a decision denying an application may, within six months after the mailing of the notice of the denial, file a verified petition in superior court for an Order Directing Payment Out of the Victims of Corporate Fraud Compensation Fund based upon the grounds set forth in the application to the Secretary of State. If the underlying judgment is a California state court judgment, the petition shall be filed in
 the court in which the underlying judgment was entered. If the underlying judgment is not a California state court judgment or is a federal court judgment, the petition shall be filed in the superior court of any county within California that would have been a proper venue if the underlying lawsuit had been filed in a California state court, or in the Superior Court of the County of Sacramento.

(b) A copy of the petition shall be served upon the Secretary of State by the claimant. A certificate or affidavit of service shall be filed by the claimant with the court. Service on the Secretary of State may be made by mail addressed to the Secretary of State’s office.

(c) The Secretary of State shall have 30 calendar days after being served with the petition in which to file a written response. The court shall thereafter set the matter for hearing upon the request of the claimant. The
 court shall grant a request of the Secretary of State for one continuance of as much as 30 calendar days and may, upon a showing of good cause by any party, continue the hearing as the court deems appropriate.

(d) The claimant shall have the burden of proving compliance with the requirements of Section 2282 by competent evidence at an evidentiary hearing. The claimant shall be entitled to a de novo review of the merits of the application as contained in the administrative record.

(e) At any time during the court proceedings, the petition may be compromised or settled by the Secretary of State and the court shall, upon joint petition of the claimant and the Secretary of State, issue an order directing payment out of the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   (SB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2288.

(a) Whenever the court proceeds upon a petition under Section 2287, it shall order payment out of the fund only upon a determination that the aggrieved party has a valid cause of action within the purview of Section 2282, and has complied with Section 2287.

(b) (1) The Secretary of State may defend any action on behalf of the fund and shall have recourse to all appropriate means of defense and review, including examination of witnesses and the right to relitigate any issues that are material and relevant in the proceeding against the fund. The claimant’s judgment shall create a rebuttable presumption of the fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit by the
 corporation, which presumption shall affect the burden of producing evidence.

(2) If the civil judgment, arbitration award, or criminal restitution order in the underlying action on which the final judgment in favor of the petitioner was by default, stipulation, consent, or pursuant to Section 594 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or if the action against the corporation or its agent was defended by a trustee in bankruptcy, the petitioner shall have the burden of proving that the cause of action against the corporation or its agent was for fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit.

(c) If the final judgment is a criminal restitution order against an agent, the petitioner shall have the burden of proving that the defendant named in the criminal restitution order qualifies as an agent
 as defined in this chapter. An active corporation, that has submitted a response to the application pursuant to Section 2282.2, may be permitted by the court to appear in the action regarding the sole issue of whether the defendant named in the criminal restitution order qualifies as its agent as defined in this chapter.

(d) The Secretary of State may move the court at any time to dismiss the petition when it appears there are no triable issues and the petition is without merit. The motion may be supported by affidavit of any person or persons having knowledge of the facts, and may be made on the basis that the petition, and the judgment referred to therein, does not form the basis for a meritorious recovery claim within the purview of Section 2282; provided, however, the Secretary of State shall give written notice at least 10 calendar days
 before hearing on the motion to the claimant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 390, Sec. 5.   (AB 2759)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2289.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter and regardless of the number of persons aggrieved in an instance of corporate fraud, or misrepresentation or deceit resulting in a judgment meeting the requirements of Section 2282, or the number of judgments against a corporation or its agent, the liability of the fund shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for any one claimant per single judgment finding fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit, made with the intent to defraud.

(b) When multiple corporations or their agents are involved in the same event or series of events that are the basis of the claimant’s final judgment and the conduct of two or more of the corporations
 or their agents results in a judgment meeting the requirements of Section 2282, the claimant may seek recovery from the fund based on the judgment against any one of the corporations or their agents, subject to the limitations of subdivision (a).

(c) When multiple claimants are involved in a corporate fraud, or in misrepresentation or deceit by a corporation or its agents, resulting in a judgment meeting the requirements of Section 2282, each claimant may seek recovery from the fund individually,
 subject to the limitations of subdivision (a).

(d) Claimants who are spouses, registered domestic partners, or persons other than natural persons, that have obtained an eligible final judgment shall be considered one claimant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 390, Sec. 6.   (AB 2759)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2290.

If, at any time, the money deposited in the fund is insufficient to satisfy any duly authorized award or offer of settlement, the Secretary of State shall, when sufficient money has been deposited in the fund, satisfy the unpaid awards or offer of settlement, in the order that the awards or offers of settlement were originally filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 390, Sec. 7.   (AB 2759)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2291.

Any sums received by the Secretary of State pursuant to any provisions of this chapter shall be deposited in the State Treasury and credited to the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   (SB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2292.

It shall be unlawful for any person or the agent of any person to file with the Secretary of State any notice, statement, or other document required under the provisions of this chapter that is false or untrue or contains any willful, material misstatement of fact. That conduct shall constitute a public offense punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than one year or a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   (SB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2293.

When the Secretary of State has paid from the fund any sum to the claimant, the Secretary of State shall be subrogated to all of the rights of the claimant and the claimant shall assign all of his or her right, title, and interest in the judgment to the Secretary of State and any amount and interest so recovered by the Secretary of State on the judgment shall be deposited in the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   (SB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2293.1.

If the Secretary of State pays from the fund any amount in settlement of a claim or toward satisfaction of a final judgment against a corporation or its agent, the corporation or its agent shall be required to pay to the fund the amount paid plus interest at the prevailing legal rate applicable to a judgment rendered in any court of this state, within 30 calendar days of the date that the Secretary of State provided notice of the payment of the award or compromise. If the corporation or its agent fails to make the required payment to the fund within the required time, the corporation shall be suspended until the payment is made. A discharge in bankruptcy shall not relieve a corporation or its agent from the penalties and disabilities provided in this
 chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 390, Sec. 8.   (AB 2759)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2294.

The Secretary of State shall not make any award to a claimant from the fund if the claimant has received payment from any other restitution funds or for the portions of the judgment that the claimant has collected from the corporation or its agent or any other defendant in the underlying judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 390, Sec. 9.   (AB 2759)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2295.

The failure of an aggrieved person to comply with all of the provisions of this chapter shall constitute a waiver of any rights hereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   (SB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2296.

(a) This chapter shall apply to applications submitted to the Secretary of State on or after January 1, 2013.

(b) On and after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision, the Secretary of State shall not accept any new applications from claimants for payment from the fund. Thereafter, the Secretary of State shall wind down the activities of the fund pursuant to this chapter. While any obligation of the Secretary of State incurred pursuant to this chapter remains outstanding and not fully performed or discharged, the rights, powers, and duties of the Secretary of
 State shall not be diminished or impaired in any manner that will adversely affect the interests and rights of existing claimants or other parties to those obligations.

(c) The Secretary of State, starting February 1, 2027, and annually thereafter until all outstanding claims have been paid, shall provide to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and other appropriate committees of the Legislature an update on the fund balance, the number of outstanding claims and the amount owed, and the estimated time for paying off any outstanding claims. When all outstanding claims are paid off, the department shall submit a notice to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and appropriate committees of the Legislature.

(d) Funding for purposes other than those described in this chapter after all outstanding claims are paid is contingent upon an appropriation of funds by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 255, Sec. 2.   (AB 184)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 23. Transition Provisions [2300. - 2319.]

2300.

As used in this chapter, the term “new law” means this division of the Corporations Code as amended by act of the California Legislature, 1975–76 Regular Session, effective January 1, 1977, and as in effect on that date; the term “prior law” means the applicable law as in effect prior to January 1, 1977; and the term “effective date” means January 1, 1977.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

2301.

(a) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, the provisions of the new law apply on and after the effective date to all corporations referred to in Section 162 existing on the effective date and to all actions taken by the directors or shareholders of such corporations on and after the effective date.

(b) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, all of the sections of the new law governing acts, contracts or other transactions by a corporation or its directors or shareholders apply only to such acts, contracts or transactions occurring on or after the effective
 date and the prior law governs such acts, contracts or transactions occurring prior thereto.

(c) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, any vote or consent by the directors or shareholders of a corporation prior to the effective date in accordance with the prior law shall be effective in accordance with the prior law and if any certificate or document is required to be filed in any public office of this state relating to such action, it may be filed after the effective date in accordance with the prior law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

2302.

The provisions of Sections 202, 204 (other than subdivision (a) thereof) and 205 of the new law relating to the contents of articles do not apply to corporations existing on the effective date unless and until an amendment of the articles is filed stating that the corporation elects to be governed by all of the provisions of the new law not otherwise applicable to it under this chapter. Such amendment may be adopted by approval of the board alone, except that, if any such amendment makes any change in the articles other than conforming the statement of purposes and powers to subdivision (b) of Section 202 and the deletion of any references to par value and location of
 principal office and deleting any statement regarding the number of directors or conforming any such statement to Section 212 (subject to Section 2304), it shall also be approved by the outstanding shares (Section 152) if such approval is otherwise required for the changes made. The amendment shall not name the corporation’s initial agent for service of process if a report required by Section 1502 has been filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

2302.1.

The provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 204, insofar as they require the inclusion of certain provisions in the articles, do not apply to the provisions of bylaws in effect on the effective date and valid under the prior law, unless and until an amendment is filed pursuant to Section 2302.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

2302.5.

The absence of any reference to par value in the articles of a corporation which is subject to the prior law relating to the contents of articles as specified in Section 2302 is equivalent to a statement that the shares of stock are to be without par value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 764, Sec. 8.5.)
-------------------------------------------

2303.

Sections 206 and 207 of the new law apply to corporations existing on the effective date, but any statement in the articles of such corporation, prior to an amendment thereof pursuant to Section 2302, relating to the purposes or powers of the corporation shall not be construed as a limitation unless it is expressly stated as such.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

2304.

The effect of a difference between the articles and bylaws in the statement of the number of directors shall not be governed by subdivision (a) of Section 212 of the new law for a corporation existing on the effective date, which shall continue to be governed by the prior law, unless and until an amendment of its articles is filed pursuant to Section 2302. If such amendment makes any change in the number of directors or the maximum or minimum number of directors or makes a change from a fixed to a variable board or vice versa, it shall also be approved by the outstanding shares (Section 152).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 919, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

2305.

Subdivision (a) of Section 312 of the new law applies to a corporation existing on the effective date, but the “treasurer” of such corporation shall be deemed to be the “chief financial officer.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

2306.

Section 317 of the new law governs any proposed indemnification by a corporation after the effective date, whether the events upon which the indemnification is based occurred before or after the effective date. Any statement relating to indemnification contained in the articles or bylaws of a corporation on the effective date shall not be construed as limiting the indemnification permitted by Section 317 unless it is expressly stated as so intended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

2307.

Sections 417 and 418 of the new law relating to required statements on certificates representing shares apply to certificates representing shares of corporations existing on the effective date only if the shares are originally issued after the effective date, and the prior law shall continue to govern the certificates representing shares originally issued prior to the effective date, unless and until an amendment of the articles is filed pursuant to Section 2302, and the certificate is presented for transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

2308.

Chapter 5 of the new law applies to any distribution to its shareholders made after the effective date by a corporation existing on the effective date, except that any such distribution effected pursuant to a contract for the purchase or redemption of shares entered into by the corporation prior to the effective date may be made if permissible under Chapter 5 or under the prior law in effect at the time the contract was entered into.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

2309.

Subdivision (a) of Section 510 of the new law applies only to shares acquired after the effective date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

2310.

The provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 600) and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 700) (other than Section 706) of the new law apply to any meeting of shareholders held after the effective date and to any action by shareholders pursuant to written consent which becomes effective after the effective date and to any vote cast at such a meeting or consent given for such action (whether or not a proxy or consent was executed by the shareholder prior to the effective date); provided, however, that the prior law shall apply to any such meeting of shareholders and to any vote cast at such a meeting if such meeting was initially called for a date prior to the
 effective date and notice thereof was given to shareholders entitled to vote thereat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

2311.

Section 706 of the new law applies to agreements and voting trusts entered into after the effective date and prior law governs such agreements or trusts entered into prior thereto unless the agreement or trust is amended or extended thereafter, in which event the new law applies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

2312.

Section 800 of the new law applies to actions commenced after the effective date and prior law governs actions pending on the effective date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

2313.

Chapters 10 (commencing with Section 1000), 11 (commencing with Section 1100), 12 (commencing with Section 1200) and 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of the new law apply to transactions consummated after the effective date, unless a required approval of the outstanding shares (Section 152) has been given prior to the effective date or has been given after the effective date but at a meeting of shareholders initially called for a date prior to the effective date, in which case the transaction shall be governed by the prior law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

2314.

Chapters 18 (commencing with Section 1800) and 20 (commencing with Section 2000) of the new law apply to actions for involuntary dissolution commenced after the effective date, but the prior law governs any such action pending on the effective date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

2315.

Chapters 19 (commencing with Section 1900) and 20 (commencing with Section 2000) of the new law apply to any voluntary dissolution proceeding initiated by the filing of an election after the effective date, but the prior law governs any such proceeding so initiated prior to the effective date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

2316.

A foreign association which has transacted intrastate business in this state prior to the effective date and which is required by Section 2105 of the new law to obtain a certificate of qualification from the Secretary of State shall not be subject to any direct or indirect penalty as a result of failure to obtain such certificate of qualification if the certificate of qualification is obtained no later than four months after the effective date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

2317.

When any corporate agent for service of process has been designated prior to the effective date and such designation of agent included a name of a city, town or village wherein the corporate agent maintained an office, service on such agent may be effected at any office of the agent set forth in the certificate of the corporate agent filed pursuant to Section 1505 of the new law or filed pursuant to Section 3301.5, 3301.6, 6403.5 or 6403.6 of the prior law, whether or not such office is in said city, town or village.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

2318.

Any corporation existing on the first day of January, 1873, formed under the laws of this state, and still existing, which has not already elected to continue its existence under the prior law, may, at any time, elect to continue its existence under the provisions of this code applicable thereto by the unanimous vote of all its directors, or such election may be made at any annual meeting of the shareholders, or at any meeting called by the directors especially for considering the subject, if voted by shareholders representing a majority of the voting power, or may be made by the directors upon the written consent of that number of the shareholders.

A certificate of the action
 of the directors, signed by them and their secretary, when the election is made by their unanimous vote, or upon the written consent of the shareholders, or a certificate of the proceedings of the meeting of the shareholders, when the election is made at any such meeting, signed by the chairperson and secretary of the meeting and a majority of the directors, shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, and thereafter the corporation continues its existence under the provisions of this code which are applicable thereto, and possesses all the rights, and powers, and is subject to all the obligations, restrictions, and limitations prescribed thereby.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 39.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2319.

If the corporate rights, privileges and powers of a corporation have been suspended and are still suspended immediately prior to the effective date pursuant to Sections 5700 through 5908 of the old law and provisions of law there referred to, said sections and provisions continue to apply to such a corporation until restoration by the Controller pursuant to said sections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------



DIVISION 1.5.  SOCIAL PURPOSE CORPORATIONS ACT [2500. - 3503.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [2500. - 2517.]

2500.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Social Purpose Corporations Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 13.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2501.

Except as otherwise expressly stated, the provisions of Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) shall apply to corporations organized under this division, and references in that division to the terms “close corporation,” “constituent corporation,” “corporation,” “disappearing corporation,” “domestic corporation,” “foreign corporation,” “surviving corporation,” and similar terms shall be read to apply, in the same manner, to include the similar “social purpose corporation.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 14.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2502.

This division applies only to social purpose corporations organized expressly under this division whether organized or existing under this division or amended, merged or converted into a social purpose corporation in accordance with Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 900) of Division 1, Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 1100) of Division 1 or Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 1150) of Division 1, including all flexible purpose corporations formed under this division prior to January 1, 2015, and now existing except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2601 and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 2602.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 15.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2502.01.

Every social purpose corporation organized under the laws of this state or similar foreign social purpose corporation, all of the capital stock of which is beneficially owned by the United States, an agency or instrumentality of the United States or any social purpose corporation or similar foreign social purpose corporation the whole of the capital stock of which is owned by the United States or by an agency or instrumentality of the United States, is conclusively presumed to be an agency and instrumentality of the United States and is entitled to all privileges and immunities to which the holders of all of its stock are entitled as agencies of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 16.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2502.02.

Unless otherwise expressly provided, whenever reference is made in this division to any other state or federal statute, that reference is to that statute as it may be amended from time to time, whether before or after the enactment of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 740, Sec. 12.   (SB 201)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2502.03.

A social purpose corporation may be sued in the same manner as a corporation as provided in the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 17.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2502.04.
